aspell/se_affix.dat
# STAHTACASE (STAHTA & IIJA)
SFX I Y 121
SFX I   0                   de                      .
SFX I   0                   det                     .
SFX I   0                   id                      ^e
SFX I   0                   idan                    ^e
SFX I   0                   idanguin                ^e
SFX I   0                   idasade                 ^e
SFX I   0                   idasadet                ^e
SFX I   0                   idasame                 ^e
SFX I   0                   idasamet                ^e
SFX I   0                   idasan                  ^e
SFX I   0                   idasas                  ^e
SFX I   0                   idasaset                ^e
SFX I   0                   idasaska                ^e
SFX I   0                   idasat                  ^e
SFX I   0                   idat                    ^e
SFX I   0                   idatguin                ^e
SFX I   0                   ide                     ^e
SFX I   0                   ideame                  ^e
SFX I   0                   ideameguin              ^e
SFX I   0                   ideamet                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ideametguin             ^e
SFX I   0                   ideaset                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ideasetguin             ^e
SFX I   0                   ideaskka                ^e
SFX I   0                   ideaskkaguin            ^e
SFX I   0                   ideatte                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ideatteguin             ^e
SFX I   0                   ideattet                ^e
SFX I   0                   ideattetguin            ^e
SFX I   0                   idis                    ^e
SFX I   0                   idisguin                ^e
SFX I   0                   iguin                   ^e
SFX I   0                   in                      ^e
SFX I   0                   inan                    ^e
SFX I   0                   inat                    ^e
SFX I   0                   ineame                  ^e
SFX I   0                   ineamet                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ineaset                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ineaskka                ^e
SFX I   0                   ineatte                 ^e
SFX I   0                   ineattet                ^e
SFX I   0                   inis                    ^e
SFX I   e                   iid                      e
SFX I   e                   iidan                    e
SFX I   e                   iidanguin                e
SFX I   e                   iidasade                 e
SFX I   e                   iidasadet                e
SFX I   e                   iidasame                 e
SFX I   e                   iidasamet                e
SFX I   e                   iidasan                  e
SFX I   e                   iidasas                  e
SFX I   e                   iidasaset                e
SFX I   e                   iidasaska                e
SFX I   e                   iidasat                  e
SFX I   e                   iidat                    e
SFX I   e                   iidatguin                e
SFX I   e                   iide                     e
SFX I   e                   iideame                  e
SFX I   e                   iideameguin              e
SFX I   e                   iideamet                 e
SFX I   e                   iideametguin             e
SFX I   e                   iideaset                 e
SFX I   e                   iideasetguin             e
SFX I   e                   iideaskka                e
SFX I   e                   iideaskkaguin            e
SFX I   e                   iideatte                 e
SFX I   e                   iideatteguin             e
SFX I   e                   iideattet                e
SFX I   e                   iideattetguin            e
SFX I   e                   iidis                    e
SFX I   e                   iidisguin                e
SFX I   e                   iiguin                   e
SFX I   e                   iin                      e
SFX I   e                   iinan                    e
SFX I   e                   iinat                    e
SFX I   e                   iineame                  e
SFX I   e                   iineamet                 e
SFX I   e                   iineaset                 e
SFX I   e                   iineaskka                e
SFX I   e                   iineatte                 e
SFX I   e                   iineattet                e
SFX I   e                   iinis                    e
SFX I   0                   me                      .
SFX I   0                   met                     .
SFX I   0                   n                      .
SFX I   0                   nan                      .
SFX I   0                   nat                      .
SFX I   0                   neame                      .
SFX I   0                   neamet                      .
SFX I   0                   neaset                      .
SFX I   0                   neaskka                      .
SFX I   0                   neatte                      .
SFX I   0                   neattet                      .
SFX I   0                   nis                      .
SFX I   0                   s                      .
SFX I   0                   san                      .
SFX I   0                   sat                      .
SFX I   0                   seame                      .
SFX I   0                   seamet                      .
SFX I   0                   seaset                      .
SFX I   0                   seaskka                      .
SFX I   0                   seatte                      .
SFX I   0                   seattet                      .
SFX I   0                   set                      .
SFX I   0                   sis                      .
SFX I   0                   ska                      .
SFX I   0                   stan                      .
SFX I   0                   stat                      .
SFX I   0                   steame                      .
SFX I   0                   steamet                      .
SFX I   0                   steaset                      .
SFX I   0                   steaskka                      .
SFX I   0                   steatte                      .
SFX I   0                   steattet                      .
SFX I   0                   stis                      .
SFX I   0                   t                      .
SFX I   a                   ii                      [^ij]a
SFX I   0                   i                       [ij]a
SFX I   e                   ii                      e
SFX I   0                   i                       [iá]
SFX I   i                   ái                      i
